Utah statutes.
19-8-113.   Applicant's release from liability.
(1) (a)  An applicant who is not responsible for the contaminant or
contamination under the provisions listed in Subsection (1)(b) at the time the
applicant applies to enter into a voluntary cleanup agreement under this
chapter is released by issuance of a certificate of completion under Section
19-8-111 from all liability to the state for cleanup of property covered by
the certificate and from all liability for claims arising under state law for
contribution regarding matters addressed by the certificate of completion,
except for any releases or consequences the applicant causes.
(b)  Provisions referred to in Subsection (1)(a) are: Title 19, Chapter 5,
Water Quality Act; Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous Waste Act;
Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 3, Hazardous Substances Mitigation Act; or Title 19,
Chapter 6, Part 4, Underground Storage Tank Act.
(2)  There is no release from liability under this chapter if a certificate of
completion is obtained by fraud, misrepresentation, or the knowing failure to
disclose material information.
(3) (a)  After a certificate of completion is issued under this chapter, an
owner who then acquires property covered by the certificate, or a lender who
then makes a loan secured by property covered by the certificate, is released
from all liability to the state regarding property covered by the certificate
for cleanup of contamination released before the date of the certificate, and
from all liability for claims arising under state law for contribution
regarding matters addressed by the certificate of completion, except under
Subsection (3)(b).
(b)  A release of liability under Subsection (3)(a) is not available to an
owner or lender under Subsection (3)(a) who:
(i)  was originally responsible for a release or contamination under Title 19,
Chapter 5, Water Quality Act; Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 1, Solid and Hazardous
Waste Act; Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 3, Hazardous Substances Mitigation Act;
or Title 19, Chapter 6, Part 4, Underground Storage Tank Act;
(ii)  changes the land use from the use specified in the certificate of
completion if the changed use or uses may reasonably be expected to result in
increased risks to human health or the environment; or
(iii)  causes further releases on the property covered by the certification.
(c)  A release under this Subsection (3) is subject to the limitations of
Subsection (2).
(4)  The executive director may issue enforceable written assurances to a
contiguous property owner of real property stating that no enforcement action
under this part may be initiated against the contiguous property owner and
providing the owner protection from state law cost recovery and contribution
actions.
